Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-114.04
Clerk; reports; period retained.

The Clerk of the Legislature shall retain the reports received from state agencies, boards, and commissions for three years after the date of receipt of such reports after which time the clerk may dispose of such reports.

Laws 1979, LB 322, § 81.